District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Youth Advisory Council on Climate Change and Environmental
Conservation Establishment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Youth Advisory Council on Climate Change and Environmental Conservation.
(a)(1) There is established the Youth Advisory Council on Climate Change and
Environmental Conservation (“Youth Climate Council”), the mission of which is to consult with
and advise the Mayor, the Council, the Department of Energy and Environment (“DOEE”), the
Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency, and other entities on the effects of, and
recommend improvements to, the District’s laws, policies, practices, programs, and budgets
regarding the following topics in the District:
(A) Climate change and mitigating or adapting to the impacts of climate
change;
(B) Environmental conservation; and
(C) Green workforce development, including apprenticeships, certification
programs, and other educational or work-based opportunities for youth.
(2) Pursuant to its mission, the Youth Climate Council may, with respect to the
topics listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(A) Provide comments and recommendations on laws and regulations;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Develop and propose its own plans, programs, or initiatives;
(C) Collaborate with other youth organizations and entities on programs,
events, or initiatives that educate and engage youth and adults;
(D) Respond to requests for comments and recommendations from District
officials, agencies, boards, commissions, and advisory committees;
(E) Present its views to the Council, the Mayor, or District agencies; and
(F) Issue or publish reports on its findings, recommendations, activities,
goals, and accomplishments.
(b) The Youth Climate Council shall have 17 voting members, to be appointed as
follows:
(1) Nine members appointed by the Mayor as follows:
(A) Six high school students, who shall be from District of Columbia
public schools, District of Columbia public charter schools, or independent schools operating
within the District; and
(B) Three individuals 18 to 21 years of age who reside within the District;
and
(2) Eight high school student members appointed by each Ward Councilmember
to represent the Councilmember’s respective ward.
(c)(1) All initial appointments to the Youth Climate Council shall be made no later than
180 days after the applicability date of this act. Initial appointments shall be as follows:
(A) Of the members appointed by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (b)(1)
of this section, 5 members shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 4 members shall be
appointed for a term of one year; and
(B) Of the members appointed by the Ward Councilmembers pursuant to
subsection (b)(2) of this section, 4 members shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 4
members shall be appointed for a term of one year.
(2) Except for the initial appointments provided in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, members of the Youth Climate Council shall be appointed for terms of 2 years.
(3) A member may be reappointed but may not serve more than 2 full terms.
(4) If an appointed high school member graduates during their term, or if a
member appointed pursuant to subsection (b)(1)(B) of this section ages past the age of 21 during
their term, they may continue to serve through their term so long as they continue to live, work,
or study in the District of Columbia.
(5) In the event of a vacancy during any voting member’s term of office, a
successor shall be appointed in the same manner as the original appointment to fill the unexpired
portion of the member’s term.
(d) Youth applying to serve on the Youth Climate Council shall:
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Be a District resident;
(2) Have substantial ties to the District, such as currently or formerly attending
school or working in the District prior to their application to serve on the Youth Climate Council;
(3) Have a general knowledge of how the District is affected by the topics listed
in subsection (a)(1) of this section that is informed by their education or personal experience;
(4) Have an interest in addressing the topics listed in subsection (a)(1) of this
section to improve the lives of District residents and safeguard the environment;
(5) Have the ability to
(A) Think creatively;
(B) Engage and educate other youth;
(C) Collaborate and work patiently and constructively in a group setting;
and
(D) Responsibly fulfill the functions of the Youth Climate Council; and
(6) Have an interest in developing leadership skills.
(e)(1) Appointed members shall be diverse in experience and backgrounds to allow for a
range of perspectives, including those of disadvantaged communities.
(2) Disadvantaged communities include those who are marginalized, underserved,
and overburdened by pollution as identified by tools such as the Metropolitan Washington
Council of Governments’ Equity Emphasis Areas, DC’s Heat Sensitivity Exposure Index, or
Office of Planning’s Low Food Access Areas map.
(f)(1) Youth Climate Council members may receive, in return for their service, the
following:
(A)(i) A stipend not to exceed $1,000 per year; or
(ii) The recognition or certification of volunteer service hours; and
(B) Recognition of their service for the purposes of receiving academic
credit, if authorized by their school.
(2) DOEE may reimburse members for reasonable travel and other expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties based on available funding.
(g) Within 60 days after a Youth Climate Council member’s commencement of service,
whether for an initial appointment or to fill a vacancy, DOEE shall provide training covering the
following topics:
(1) An overview of the District’s government and political processes and
structure;
(2) The District’s current environmental policy landscape, including current
progress on climate action plans and strategies affecting youth;
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Statutory mandates and responsibilities of Youth Climate Council members
and staff;
(4) Requirements of the Open Meetings Act, effective March 31, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-350; D.C. Official Code § 2-571 et seq.), and how to conduct meetings based on Robert’s
Rules of Order; and
(5) Informational material provided by the Office of Open Government
concerning the duties of Youth Climate Council members, and other District boards,
commissions, and advisory bodies.
Sec. 3. Functions and procedures of the Youth Climate Council.
(a)(1) The Youth Climate Council shall elect from among its membership a chairperson,
vice-chairperson, and secretary, each for a term of one year.
(2) These officers shall be re-elected annually or in the event of a vacancy, but
shall serve no more than 2 terms in any combination of offices.
(3) The Youth Climate Council may vote to create other leadership positions from
within its membership.
(4) The Youth Climate Council may form committees or working groups from its
membership to consider specific subtopics and invite participation from outside individuals and
entities, including the public and subject-matter experts.
(b)(1) The Youth Climate Council shall meet at least once per month.
(2) The chairperson of the Youth Climate Council, or vice-chairperson in the
chairperson’s absence, shall, in consultation with and with the assistance of the Department of
Energy and Environment (“DOEE”), convene all Youth Climate Council meetings.
(3) A majority of the members appointed to the Youth Climate Council at any
given time shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.
(c)(1) The Youth Climate Council may provide updates to the Commission on Climate
Change and Resiliency (“Commission”) at each of the Commission’s quarterly meetings, and
may seek the advice of the Commission as needed.
(2) The Youth Climate Council shall meet jointly with the Commission at least
once each year to exchange information and feedback related to common issues and concerns.
(d) All actions of the Youth Climate Council shall be considered advisory and shall be
approved by a majority vote of the members present and voting at a meeting.
(e)(1) DOEE shall provide principal staff to support the activities of the Youth Climate
Council, to include:
(A) Convening and managing logistics for meetings;
(B) Delivering and coordinating education and training;
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Partnering with other agencies, the Council, organizations, and
colleges; and
(D) Assisting with the development, publication, and submission of all
reports to the Council and Mayor.
(2) The Youth Climate Council may use space and supplies owned or rented by
the District government for purposes consistent with this act.
(3) The Council shall provide staff assistance to the Youth Climate Council for
the purposes of facilitating comments on all proposed legislation pending before the Council of
interest to the Youth Climate Council.
(4) The chairpersons of the Council committees with jurisdiction over the
environment, energy, and natural resources shall provide an opportunity for the Youth Climate
Council to report in person on its findings and recommendations at least once each year.
Sec. 4. Section 1108(c-2) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1979, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
611.08(c-2)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(b) A new paragraph (11) to read as follows:
“(11) Each member of the Youth Council on Climate Change and Environmental
Conservation appointed pursuant to section 2 of the Youth Advisory Council on Climate Change
and Environmental Conservation Establishment Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on October
21, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-66), may receive compensation in the form of a stipend of
not more than $1000 per year, in accordance with standards the Mayor may establish by
rulemaking.".
Sec. 5. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 7. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
6